Wisconsin, session 2025, AB249.
do enact as follows:AB249,13Section 1. 30.542 of the statutes is created to read:AB249,2,2130.542 Abandonment of boat prohibited. (1) In this section, “abandon” 2means any of the following: AB249,2,43(a) Leaving a boat unattended, without demonstrated intent to return to or 4moor or maintain the boat, for a period of more than 7 consecutive days.AB249,2,95(b) Leaving a boat that is partially submerged, in a state of disrepair, or 6otherwise neglected such that the boat presents a hazard to navigation, public 7safety, or environmental health and the owner has failed to take reasonable actions 8to remove or maintain the boat after notice from the department or a local law 9enforcement agency.AB249,2,1210(2) No person may abandon a boat on the waters of this state or upon any 11adjacent riparian land without the express consent of the landowner or the owner of 12riparian rights.AB249,2,1613(3) (a) If a law enforcement officer determines that a boat has been 14abandoned, the officer shall issue a written notice to the last known owner of record 15for the boat, if ascertainable, requiring the owner to remove the boat within 30 days 16of receipt of the notice.AB249,2,1917(b) If an owner fails to remove a boat subject to a notice under par. (a) within 18the specified time, or if the owner cannot be identified, the department or a local 19law enforcement agency may remove, impound, or dispose of the boat.AB249,2,2320(c) Notwithstanding par. (b), if an abandoned boat presents a hazard to 21navigation, public safety, or environmental health, the department or a local law 22enforcement agency may remove, impound, or dispose of the boat immediately and 23without providing notice.AB249,3,224(d) In addition to any penalties under s. 30.80 (7), any person violating sub. (2) 1shall be liable for all costs incurred by the department or a local law enforcement 2agency for the removal, storage, or disposal of the abandoned boat. AB249,23Section 2. 30.80 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB249,3,5430.80 (7) (a) Any person violating s. 30.542 (2) and (3) (a) shall be subject to a 5fine not to exceed $10,000 or imprisonment not to exceed 9 months, or both.AB249,3,116(b) In addition to any penalties under par. (a), for any person violating s. 730.542 (2) and (3) (a), the department shall require the person to obtain a certificate 8of satisfactory completion of a safety course under s. 30.74 (1). If the person has a 9valid certificate at the time that the court imposes sentence under par. (a), the 10department shall permanently revoke the certificate and order the person to obtain 11a certificate of satisfactory completion of a safety course under s. 30.74 (1).AB249,3,1212